New York, session 2025-2026, A8900.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 151 of the workers' compensation law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 2-a to read as follows: 3 2-a. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision two of this 4 section, for fiscal years beginning on and after April first, two thou- 5 sand twenty-six, for those affected employers who obtain coverage which 6 includes the alternative to operate an alternate dispute resolution 7 program for the express purpose of administering workers' compensation 8 benefits for the employees of such employers through a self-insurance 9 plan which has been approved by the chair as referenced in subdivision 10 three of section two hundred twenty-eight of this chapter, the chair 11 shall establish an assessment rate which reflects the savings in addi- 12 tional estimated annual administrative expenses which the board would 13 have incurred, but for the establishment of such alternative by the 14 employer, and which is at a rate which in no event shall exceed fifty 15 percent of the assessment rate for all other affected employers as 16 described in subdivision two of this section. 17 § 2. Section 228 of the workers' compensation law is amended by adding 18 a new subdivision 3 to read as follows: 19 3. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision one of this section, 20 in computing the estimated annual expenses necessary to administer such 21 provisions of law for fiscal years beginning on and after April first, 22 two thousand twenty-six, for all employers who utilize a dispute resol- 23 ution program to administer workers' compensation benefits and who no 24 longer participate in the program provided for in subdivision eight of EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13367-01-5 A. 8900 2 1 section fifteen of this chapter as a result of their execution of a 2 wholesale agreement with the board, the assessment rate for those 3 employees to pay their fair share of the estimated annual amount shall 4 be as determined pursuant to the provisions of subdivision two-a of 5 section one hundred fifty-one of this chapter. 6 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.